Connecticut, session 2026, SB00053.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
fifty thousand dollars, the proceeds of which shall be used by the
Department of Correction for the purpose of establishing a garden at the
York Correctional Institution to grow produce for the inmates.